Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.384

[Art. 40] Continuances.

The military judge or a court-martial without a military judge may, for reasonable cause, grant a continuance to any party for such time and as often as may appear to be just.

[ 1989 c 48 s 39; 1963 c 220 s 42.]